Hawaii statutes.
[§291C-115] Wheel boots prohibited.
(a) It shall be unlawful for a person or entity, including any county
police department, to apply or cause to be applied, a wheel boot to a motor
vehicle located on any public or private street, roadway, or highway, as
applicable, or on any public or private property, as applicable.

(b) For purposes of this section, "wheel
boot" includes a tire lock, denver boot, wheel clamp, or wheel
immobilizer.

(c) Any person, entity, or police department
violating this section shall be fined $100 for each application of a wheel
boot. [L 2013, c 285, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next